District of Columbia statutes.
34-2202.06b

Repealed

Storm Water Permit Compliance Enterprise Fund.

Repealed.

Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-111, § 206b
as added June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-311, § 2(b), 48 DCR 3512
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-371, § 3(b), 56 DCR 1353